Massachusetts, session 194th, H981.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
(a) There shall be a special commission established to study statewide opportunities for
improving pollinator health by increasing and enhancing native pollinator habitat.
The commission shall focus on identifying statewide opportunities for enhancing and
expanding pollinator habitat in both developed and natural areas such as farm field borders,
forest borders, residential areas, parks, urban areas, industrial areas, energy transmission
corridors, energy generating facilities and transportation corridors.
The commission shall consider enhancing and expanding pollinator habitat for a broad
range of native and managed pollinators including but not limited to wild and managed bees,
butterflies, moths, beetles, ants, bats and birds.
of 3

The commission shall report its findings, including any proposed legislation, to the house
and senate committees on ways and means, and the joint committee on environment, natural
resources and agriculture no later than March 1, 2026.
The commission shall consist of 11 members including:
1 member of the house of representatives, without a designating party; 1 member of the
senate, without a designating party; the secretary of energy and environmental affairs or a
designee, who shall serve as chair; the commissioner of the division of fisheries and wildlife, or a
designee; the commissioner of agricultural resources, or a designee; and 6 members appointed by
the governor: 1 of whom shall be a university of massachusetts faculty member specializing in
the science of pollinator health; 1 of whom shall be a representative of the university of
massachusetts extension with knowledge in crops which rely on pollinators and pollinator health;
1 of whom shall represent an advocacy group for farmers; 1 of whom shall be a beekeeper
representing a regional or statewide beekeeping organization; 1 of whom shall represent an
advocacy group for nurseries; and 1 of whom shall represent a membership based non-profit
advocacy group dedicated to land protection.
(b) The special commission shall examine issues relevant to pollinator health, including:
(i) identifying current laws and regulations in the commonwealth and other states and countries
related to protecting pollinators and pollinator health; (ii) studying public education and outreach
plans regarding pollinator habitat that have been successful in other states; (iii) identifying
adequacy of funding for efforts to promote or protect pollinator habitat; (iv) investigating the
means used by other states to gather data on populations of pollinators; (v) evaluating existing
best management practices for promoting pollinator health including, but not limited to, foraging
of 3

and proper food source diversity; (vi) studying the use of agricultural and nonagricultural lands,
such as transportation corridors, energy transmission corridors, parks, and working forests, and
how they may be used to provide pollinator forage and unique opportunities to increase
pollinator populations; (vii) research and identify ways to expand and coordinate public
education programs outlining steps individuals and businesses can take to help address the loss
of pollinator habitat.
of 3